Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.100

Business license—Issuance or renewal—Denial.

(1) The department may refuse to issue or renew a business license to any person if:

(a) The person does not have a valid tax registration, if required by a regulatory agency;

(b) The person is a corporation delinquent in fees or penalties owing to the secretary of state or is not validly registered under Title 23B RCW, chapter 18.100 RCW, Title 24 RCW, or any other statute now or hereafter adopted which gives corporate or business licensing responsibilities to the secretary of state if the person is required to be so registered and the regulatory agency having the authority to approve the issuance or renewal of the license requires, as a condition of such approval, that the person be so registered or not delinquent in fees or penalties owing to the secretary of state; or

(c) The person has not submitted the sum of all fees and deposits required for the requested individual license endorsements, any outstanding business license delinquency fee, or other fees and penalties to be collected through the system.

(2) Nothing in this section prevents registration by the state of a business for taxation purposes, or an employer for the purpose of paying an employee of that employer industrial insurance or unemployment insurance benefits.

[ 2013 c 144 s 24; 2011 c 298 s 9; 1997 c 58 s 865; 1991 c 72 s 8; 1982 c 182 s 10.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Intent—Agency transfer—Contracting—Effective date—2011 c 298: See notes following RCW 19.02.020.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.